Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3500.1 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Streamlined
Services Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3500.2 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The purpose of the Streamlined Services Act is to establish
a unified and streamlined eligibility and enrollment system within
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1575 Page 1

the Oklahoma Department of Human Services to improve access to and
management of services for Oklahomans.
B. The system shall promote efficiency, accessibility, and
coordination of services across programs, including but not limited
to:
1. Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP);
2. Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF);
3. Child care subsidies;
4. Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP);
5. Medicaid; and
6. Women, Infants, and Children (WIC).
C. The Department shall coordinate with the Oklahoma Health
Care Authority, the State Department of Health, and any other state
agency or community partner that administers a program specified in
subsection B of this section to implement the provisions of this
act.
D. The Department shall conduct a feasibility study to identify
opportunities to integrate additional programs into the system over
time.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3500.3 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Streamlined Services Act:

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1575 Page 2

1. "Applicant" means any individual or household seeking
benefits or services through the programs specified in Section 2 of
this act; and
2. "Integrated access system" means a single, technology-driven
platform that enables residents to apply for, manage, and renew
benefits across multiple human services programs.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3500.4 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services shall develop, implement, and
administer an integrated access system that:
1. Provides a single point of access for applicants to apply
for and manage benefits across eligible programs;
2. Utilizes a secure, user-friendly, web-based platform
accessible via computers, mobile devices, and kiosks;
3. Includes functionality for real-time status updates,
document uploads, and communication between applicants and
administrative staff;
4. Ensures accessibility for individuals with disabilities and
individuals with limited English proficiency; and
5. Integrates data-sharing capabilities to streamline
eligibility determinations while maintaining compliance with state
and federal privacy laws.

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1575 Page 3

SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3500.5 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services shall:
1. Issue a request for proposals (RFP) for the development and
implementation of the integrated access system within six (6) months
of the effective date of this act; and
2. Launch the system for public use within one (1) year of the
effective date of this act.
B. The Department shall establish interim benchmarks and
provide progress updates to the Governor and the Legislature every
six (6) months until the system is fully operational.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 7. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 1575 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1575 Page 5